Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2253.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the School Life Support Coaches Act.Section 2. Legislative findings and declarations.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) High school students face increasing rates of anxiety, depression, social isolation and disengagement.(2) Licensed school psychologists, social workers and counselors are often overburdened, leaving gaps in daily emotional support.(3) Hiring additional licensed clinicians to provide daily mentoring is financially and practically infeasible.123456789101112131415161718 (4) Establishing school life support coaches will provide consistent, daily nonclinical support, complementing existing licensed staff.(b) Purpose.--The purpose of this act is to provide for the nonclinical, daily support role of school life support coaches who can provide mentorship, social and emotional guidance, crisis assistance and connection to school and community resources.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Coach." A school life support coach who is a trained, nonclinical professional providing daily emotional support, mentorship, crisis response and social and emotional guidance."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."High need." A school or district with elevated student mental health risks, disengagement or limited support based on criteria, including poverty rate, attendance, social-economic learning metrics or risk of dropout."Nonclinical support." Activities focused on resilience, coping skills, mentorship and immediate emotional assistance without therapy, diagnosis or treatment.Section 4. Staffing.(a) Requirement.--In accordance with the timing in section 12, each public high school shall employ at least one coach, in accordance with the following ratios:(1) A high-need school or district, one coach for every 300 students.20260HB2253PN2946 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A school or district that is not considered high need, one coach for every 500 students.(b) Sharing.--Districts may share coaches regionally to reduce costs and optimize coverage.(c) Limitation.--A coach shall not perform duties assigned to counselors, social workers or psychologists.Section 5. Duties of coaches.A coach shall:(1) Provide daily one-on-one or small group social emotional support.(2) Respond to nonclinical emotional crises, including panic, grief or stress, refer students requiring clinical intervention to licensed staff and document referrals in accordance with district policy.(3) Mentor students at risk of disengagement, isolation or dropout.(4) Facilitate workshops and activities to build community and promote a safe and inclusive school climate.(5) Connect students to school and community resources.Section 6. Qualifications.(a) Minimum credentials.--A coach shall have one of the following:(1) A bachelor's degree in education, human services, youth development, public health, restorative justice or a related field with at least two years experience.(2) An associate's degree with at least four years of relevant experience.(b) Licensed clinicians.--A licensed clinician may serve as a coach if the coaching is done in a nonclinical scope.(c) Training.--Each coach shall be trained in the following:20260HB2253PN2946 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Trauma-informed care.(2) Crisis prevention and intervention in a nonclinical manner.(3) Cultural competence and equity.(4) Restorative practices.(d) Continuing education.--At least 15 hours per year of district-managed or optional department-provided modules shall be required of coaches.(e) Scope restrictions.--The following must be done through coordinated referrals with licensed staff:(1) Therapy.(2) Diagnosis.(3) Academic instructions.Section 7. Compensation, funding and incentives.(a) Compensation.--The department shall provide guidance to school districts on competitive and equitable compensation for school life support coaches. The following shall apply:(1) In providing this guidance, the department shall consider:(i) Regional cost-of-living differences.(ii) School district budgets and staffing capacities.(iii) Coach qualifications, credentials and experience.(iv) High-need priorities within districts.(2) School districts shall determine coach compensation in alignment with this guidance, ensuring that positions are attractive, sustainable and effective in meeting each student's social and emotional needs.(b) Sources of funding.--Compensation and related expenses 20260HB2253PN2946 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for coaches may be supported through one or more of the following:(1) School district allocations.(2) State grants, including programs focused on mental health or social-emotional learning.(3) Federal grants, including programs for students with disabilities or school-based mental health services.(4) Public-private partnerships.(c) Incentives and bonuses.--Districts may offer additional stipends, bonuses or other incentives to:(1) Attract and retain coaches in high-need schools.(2) Recruit bilingual, culturally competent or specialized staff.(3) Recognize exceptional performance or additional responsibilities that enhance student support.(d) Purpose and oversight.--Districts shall have flexibility while ensuring accountability and alignment with the mission of this act. Each district shall provide consistent, daily mentorship, social and emotional guidance and crisis support to students. The department may provide additional technical assistance, resources or recommendations to ensure successful implementation across all districts.Section 8. Departmental duties.The department has the following duties:(1) Providing:(i) Optional templates and guidance for recruitment and job descriptions.(ii) Optional start-up grants through existing programs to fund initial hiring or training.(iii) Optional templates and guidance for district 20260HB2253PN2946 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reporting and program evaluation.(iv) Optional technical assistance and training resources.(v) Optional assistance with determining timing and staffing based on capacity.(2) Reviewing aggregate or sample-based data every three years and may issue recommendations to the General Assembly.Section 9. District duties.(a) Reporting.--Each district must report annually to the department all of the following information:(1) Number of coaches employed.(2) Student-to-coach ratios.(3) Number of check-ins, workshops and referrals made.(4) Aggregate outcomes in:(i) Attendance.(ii) Engagement.(iii) Disciplinary incidents.(iv) Incidents.(b) Form.--Districts may report this information using optional forms created by the department.Section 10. Liability, confidentiality and reporting.(a) Liability.--A coach or other employee shall be protected from liability for good-faith actions within the coach's or employee's defined scope of employment.(b) Confidentiality and mandated reporting.--Confidentiality shall be maintained between the student and coach except for when referral or mandated reporting is required.Section 11. Noninterference and collaboration.(a) Limitation.--Coaches shall not replace or override counselors, social workers, psychologists or special education 20260HB2253PN2946 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 staff.(b) Collaboration.--Coaches are required to collaborate with licensed staff for referrals only.Section 12. Department planned phase-in.The department shall provide a roll out planned in accordance with the following:(1) Identified high need districts shall begin to use coaches starting with the first full school year after the effective date of this section.(2) Beginning with the 2029-2030 school year, all districts shall be required to have coaches on staff in accordance with this act.Section 13. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2253PN2946 - 7 - 1234567891011121314